District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.05

Voluntary surrender of firearms, destructive devices, or ammunition; immunity from prosecution; determination of evidentiary value of firearm.

(a)

If a person or organization within the District voluntarily and peaceably delivers and abandons to the Chief any firearm, destructive device or ammunition at any time, such delivery shall preclude the arrest and prosecution of such person on a charge of violating any provision of this unit with respect to the firearm, destructive device, or ammunition voluntarily delivered. Delivery under this section may be made at any police district, station, or central headquarters, or by summoning a police officer to the person’s residence or place of business. Every firearm and destructive device to be delivered and abandoned to the Chief under this section shall be transported in accordance with § 22-4504.02 and, in the case of delivery to a police facility, the package shall be carried in open view. No person who delivers and abandons a firearm, destructive device, or ammunition under this section, shall be required to furnish identification, photographs, or fingerprints. No amount of money shall be paid for any firearm, destructive device, or ammunition delivered and abandoned under this section.

(b)

Whenever any firearm, destructive device, or any ammunition is surrendered under this section or pursuant to § 7-2502.10(c)(1), the Chief shall inquire of the United States Attorney and the Corporation Counsel for the District whether such firearm is needed as evidence; provided, that if the same is not needed as evidence, it shall be destroyed.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 705, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(p), 56 DCR 1365
Prohibition on transfer of ammunition feeding devices: For provisions prohibiting the transfer by the Metropolitan Police Department of ammunition feeding devices, see § 4-191.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(p) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary prohibition on the transfer by the Metropolitan Police Department of any ammunition feeding device, see § 2 of the Prohibition on the Transfer of Firearms Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-58, May 18, 1995, 42 DCR 2574).
For temporary (225 day) provisions prohibiting the transfer by the Metropolitan Police Department of ammunition feeding devices, see § 2 of Prohibition on the Transfer of Firearms Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-35, September 8, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 5304).
D.C. Law 17-372, in subsec. (a), substituted “shall be transported in accordance with § 4504.02,” for “shall be unloaded and securely wrapped in a package”.
1973 Ed., § 6-1875.
1981 Ed., § 6-2375.
This section is referenced in § 5-133.16, § 7-2502.10, § 7-2504.06, and § 7-2505.01.
Ammunition feeding devices transfers, prohibition, see § 5-133.16.